Utah statutes.
26-21-9.   Application for license -- Information required -- Public records.

(1)  An application for license shall be made to the department in a form prescribed by the department.  The application and other documentation requested by the department as part of the application process shall require such information as the committee determines necessary to ensure compliance with established rules.

(2)  Information received by the department in reports and inspections shall be public records, except the information shall not be disclosed if it directly or indirectly identifies any individual other than the owner or operator of a health facility (unless disclosure is required by law) or if its disclosure would otherwise constitute an unwarranted invasion of personal privacy.

(3)  Information received by the department from a  health care facility, pertaining to that  facility's accreditation by a voluntary accrediting organization, shall be private data except for a summary prepared by the department related to licensure standards.

